Utah statutes.
20A-11-1002.   Retention and public inspection of financial statements -- Written complaint if statement is false or unlawful.

(1)  The chief election officer shall:

(a)  make each financial statement required by this chapter or Chapter 12, Part 2, Judicial Retention Elections:

(i)  open to public inspection in the office of the chief election officer; and

(ii)  available for viewing on the Internet in accordance with Section 20A-11-103;

(b)  preserve those statements for at least five years; and

(c)  provide certified copies of the financial statements in the same manner as for other public records.

(2)  Any candidate or voter may file a written complaint with the chief election officer alleging that a filed financial statement does not conform to law or to the truth.

